Mississippi, session 2026, HB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-59-10, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-59-10.  (1)  If a customer of a residential builder or remodeler required under this chapter to be licensed by the State Board of Contractors requests a financial itemization for  residential construction or residential improvements performed, the residential builder or remodeler shall provide to the customer, no later than fifteen (15) business days after receiving the request, an itemized listing including no less than:  invoices; fees; receipts for materials; and the fee charged for the completed job. (2)  The State Board of Contractors shall establish an acceptable range of fees for construction and remodeling costs.  For a completed project determined by the board to be a large project, the fee may not exceed twenty percent (20%) of construction costs, and for a completed project determined by the board to be a small project, the fee may not exceed an hourly rate of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) per hour.  The board shall adopt a rule setting forth a clear description for what is considered a large project and a small project and the corresponding range of acceptable fees for each size project, subject to the limitations prescribed in this subsection. (3)  A contractor who violates this section may be subject to disciplinary action by the board under Section 73-15-13.  In addition, a violation of subsection (2) of this section is considered an unfair method of competition or deceptive trade practice under Section 75-24-5, and an action may be brought against the person under the consumer protection laws of this state (Sections 75-24-1 through 75-24-29). SECTION 2.  Section 75-24-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-24-5.  (1)  Unfair methods of competition affecting commerce and unfair or deceptive trade practices in or affecting commerce are prohibited.  Action may be brought under Section 75-24-5(1) only under the provisions of Section 75-24-9. (2)  Without limiting the scope of subsection (1) of this section, the following unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive trade practices or acts in the conduct of any trade or commerce are * * *hereby prohibited: (a)  Passing off goods or services as those of another; (b)  Misrepresentation of the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services; (c)  Misrepresentation of affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by another; (d)  Misrepresentation of designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services; (e)  Representing that goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection that he does not have; (f)  Representing that goods are original or new if they are reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand; (g)  Representing that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they are of another; (h)  Disparaging the goods, services, or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact; (i)  Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised; (j)  Advertising goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity; (k)  Misrepresentations of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions; (l)  Advertising by or on behalf of any licensed or regulated health care professional which does not specifically describe the license or qualifications of the licensed or regulated health care professional; (m)  Charging an increased premium for reinstating a motor vehicle insurance policy that was cancelled or suspended by the insured solely for the reason that he was transferred out of this state while serving in the United States Armed Forces or on active duty in the National Guard or United States Armed Forces Reserve. It is also an unfair practice for an insurer to charge an increased premium for a new motor vehicle insurance policy if the applicant for coverage or his covered dependents were previously insured with a different insurer and canceled that policy solely for the reason that he was transferred out of this state while serving in the United States Armed Forces or on active duty in the National Guard or United States Armed Forces Reserve.  For purposes of determining premiums, an insurer shall consider such persons as having maintained continuous coverage.  The provisions of this paragraph (m) shall apply only to such instances when the insured does not drive the vehicle during the period of cancellation or suspension of his policy; (n)  Violating the provisions of Section 75-24-8; (o)  Violating the provisions of Section 73-3-38; (p)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 149, Mississippi Code of 1972; * * * and (q)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 45, Chapter 38, Mississippi Code of 1972 * * *.; (r)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 151, Mississippi Code of 1972 * * *.; and (s)  Violating the provisions of Section 73-59-10(2). SECTION 3.  Section 73-59-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-59-13.  (1)  The board, upon satisfactory proof and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board pertaining thereto, is authorized to take the disciplinary actions provided for in this section against any person for any of the following reasons: (a)  Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules or regulations of the board pertaining to the work of residential building or residential improvement; (b)  Fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in obtaining a license; (c)  Gross negligence or misconduct; (d)  Engaging in work of residential building or residential improvement on an expired license or while under suspension or revocation of license unless the suspension or revocation be abated in accordance with this chapter; (e)  Loaning a license to an unlicensed person; (f)  Failing to maintain workers' compensation insurance, if applicable; or (g)  Failing to pay for goods or services for which the builder is contractually bound. (2)  Any person, including members of the board, may prefer charges against any other person for committing any of the acts set forth in subsection (1) of this section.  Such charges shall be sworn to, either upon actual knowledge or upon information and belief, and shall be filed with the board. The board shall investigate all charges filed with it and, upon finding reasonable cause to believe that the charges are not frivolous, unfounded or filed in bad faith, may, in its discretion, cause a hearing to be held, at a time and place fixed by the board, regarding the charges and may compel the accused by subpoena to appear before the board to respond to such charges. The board may send a certified inspector to inspect the building or structure which is the subject of a complaint or the board may use a county certified building inspector from the county where the building or structure is located to inspect the building or structure which is the subject of a complaint.  The report of the inspector shall be used in the investigation and the determination of the board.  The provisions above shall only apply to hearings. No disciplinary action may be taken until the accused has been furnished both a statement of the charges against him and notice of the time and place of the hearing thereon, which shall be personally served on such accused or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known business or residence address of the accused not less than thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing.  The complaining party shall be notified of the place and time of the hearing by mail to the last known business or residence address of the complaining party not less than thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. (3)  At any hearing held hereunder, the board shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and may also require the production of books, papers, documents or other materials which may be pertinent to the proceedings.  The board may designate or secure a hearing officer to conduct the hearing.  All evidence shall be presented under oath, which may be administered by any member of the board, and thereafter the proceedings may, if necessary, be transcribed in full by a court reporter and filed as part of the record in the case. Copies of such transcriptions may be provided to any party to the proceedings at a price reflecting actual cost, to be fixed by the board. All witnesses who are subpoenaed and appear in any proceedings before the board shall receive the same fees and mileage as allowed by law to witnesses in county, circuit and chancery court pursuant to Section 25-7-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, and all such fees shall be taxed as part of the costs in the case. When, in any proceeding before the board, any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. The accused and the complaining party shall have the right to be present at the hearing in person, by counsel or other representative, or both.  The board is authorized for proper cause to continue or recess the hearing as may be necessary. (4)  At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may either decide the issue at that time or take the case under advisement for further deliberation.  The board shall render its decision not more than ninety (90) days after the close of the hearing and shall forward to the last-known business or residence address of the accused, by certified mail, return receipt requested, a written statement of the decision of the board. (5)  If a majority of the board finds the accused guilty of the charges filed, the board may: (a)  Issue a public or private reprimand; (b)  Suspend or revoke the license of the accused; (c)  Order completion of an additional educational requirement prescribed by the board not to exceed two (2) hours per violation; or (d)  In lieu of or in addition to any reprimand, suspension, revocation, or education requirement, assess and levy upon the guilty party a monetary penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation. (6)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of such penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the guilty party elects.  Money collected by the board under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the State Board of Contractors Fund. When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board in accordance with this section is not paid when due, the board shall have the power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county of residence of the delinquent party; however, if the delinquent party is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, such proceedings shall be in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (7)  When the board has taken a disciplinary action under this section, the board may, in its discretion, stay such action and place the guilty party on probation for a period not to exceed one (1) year upon the condition that such party shall not further violate either the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the practice of residential construction or residential remodeling or the bylaws, rules or regulations promulgated by the board. (8)  The board shall not assess any of the costs of disciplinary proceedings conducted pursuant to this section against the prevailing party. (9)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy the monetary penalties provided for in this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceedings, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (10)  The board, for sufficient cause, may reissue a revoked license whenever a majority of the board members vote to do so. (11)  Within ten (10) days after any order, judgment or action of the board, any person aggrieved thereby may appeal such order, judgment or action either to the chancery court of the county wherein the appellant resides or to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon giving bond with sufficient security in the amount of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), approved by the clerk of the chancery court and conditioned to pay any costs which may be adjudged against such person.  In lieu of the bond, the appellant may post Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) with the clerk of the chancery court and conditioned to pay any costs which may be adjudged against such person. Notice of appeal shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery clerk, who shall issue a writ of certiorari directed to the board commanding it within forty-five (45) days after service thereof to certify to such court its entire record in the matter in which the appeal has been taken.  The appeal shall thereupon be heard in due course by the court, and the court shall review the record and shall affirm or reverse the judgment.  If the judgment is reversed, the chancery court or chancellor shall render such order or judgment as the board ought to have rendered, and certify the same to the board; and costs shall be awarded as in other cases. Appeals may be had to the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi as provided by law from any final action of the chancery court.  The board may employ counsel to defend all such appeals, to be paid out of the funds in the State Board of Contractors Fund. On appeal, any order, judgment or action of the board revoking a certificate of responsibility or residential license shall remain in full force unless the chancery court or Supreme Court reverses such order, judgment or action of the board. The remedies provided under this chapter for any aggrieved person shall not be exclusive, but shall be cumulative of and supplemental to any other remedies which he may otherwise have in law or in equity, whether by injunction or otherwise. (12)  Any political subdivision or agency of this state which receives a complaint against a residential builder or remodeler shall, in addition to exercising whatever authority such political subdivision or agency has been given over such complaint, forward the complaint to the board. (13)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.